District of Columbia statutes.
10-133

Public convenience stations — Establishment; location; control.

(a)

The Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized and empowered to construct and establish, in the City of Washington, District of Columbia, 2 public convenience stations, each of the same to afford accommodations for 20 males and 10 females.

(b)

The said public convenience stations shall be located on public space to be selected by the said Mayor of the District of Columbia. And the jurisdiction and control of such portion of any public reservation so selected as shall be required for the location of such stations and their approaches is hereby transferred from the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, such transfer to take effect from the date of notice by the said Mayor to the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army of the location of sites of such stations.

History

Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 984, ch. 1414, §§ 1, 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 10-134.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-133.
1973 Ed., § 8-139.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.